morphophonology/foma/enclit.lexc
Multichar_Symbols @R.NMLZ_V.ON@ @D.SCLIT.ON@ @P.SCLIT.ON@

! these seem to be able to occur in any order

LEXICON Root
=axʷ            #;
@D.SCLIT.ON@@P.SCLIT.ON@@R.NMLZ_V.ON@=s #;

! subordinating subj markers
=aləp    #; ! 2pl.sbrd
=as      #; ! 3sbrd
#;
